Hawaii statutes.
[§321-513] Enforcement;
administrative penalties. (a) The department may set, charge, and collect
administrative fines and recover administrative fees and costs, including
attorney's fees and costs, resulting from a violation of this part or any rule
adopted under this part.

(b) The department shall:

(1) Establish a policy and procedures to monitor
compliance with this part, including a complaint process;

(2) Respond to any complaint received by the
department concerning noncompliance by a hospital with the requirements of
section 321-512; and

(3) Provide written notice to any hospital that the
department determines is in violation of this part or any rule adopted under
this part, including notice of an opportunity to take corrective action.

(c) Any hospital that violates this part or
any rule adopted under this part after receiving written notice and an
opportunity to take corrective action pursuant to subsection (b)(3) shall be
fined not more than $1,000 for each separate offense.

(d) All enforcement processes shall comply
with section 321-20.

(e) Sanctions under this section shall not be
issued for violations occurring before July 1, 2014. [L 2013, c 27, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next